epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/ga.xml
	<patterns>
		.ab4ai
		.ab6ar
		.ab5r
		.ac6ad
		.ach6ar
		.ad6aim
		.ad6am
		.ae5n
		.ag6ar
		.agh4a
		.ag4ó
		.ag5r
		.ag6úi
		.ai6c5
		.ail6te
		.ain3g4
		.ain6te.
		.ain6t5ín
		.air6ní
		.ais3
		.aist4
		.ais6te.
		.aí4
		.ala5m6
		.al5g6
		.allag6
		.alm4ó
		.al2t5a
		.al6t5á
		.am6ac
		.am6á
		.an2a
		.ana5c
		.anach6
		.an2á
		.anc6
		.an6dór
		.an6dr
		.an6fa
		.ang4l
		.an6i
		.an6lain
		.an6lan
		.an6ó
		.an6rai
		.an6sa
		.an2ta
		.ar2
		.aral4
		.aralt3
		.ara5m6
		.ara5s6
		.ard5
		.aró5
		.aróc6
		.art4
		.as6ail
		.as6aim5
		.as6al.
		.as6am
		.asa5m6a
		.asc6ar
		.as6ó
		.as6pa.
		.as2t
		.ast5ai
		.ast5aí
		.ast3ó
		.as6tú
		.as4ú
		.ata6
		.at5ar.
		.at6á
		.áil6te.
		.áil6t5ea
		.áir5ge
		.áir5gí
		.áir6s
		.ál6t
		.ár2a
		.ár6m
		.ba6d
		.bad3á
		.bal6b
		.beo5f
		.beo5g
		.beo5id
		.beo5im
		.bh4
		.bhá5ite.
		.bhá5ití
		.bheo5f
		.bheo5id
		.bheo5im
		.bheo5in
		.bhí5dís
		.bhí5mis
		.bhí5oda
		.bhí5omar
		.bhí5teá
		.bhí5tí
		.bhlí3
		.bhreo5f
		.bhreo5id
		.bhreo5im
		.bhreo5in
		.bhrí3o
		.blí3
		.breo5f
		.breo5id
		.breo5im
		.brí3o
		.ca4
		.cach5
		.cacht6
		.cad5á
		.caí5d
		.caí5gí
		.caí5m
		.caí5o
		.car6t5ar
		.ch4
		.cha4
		.chach5
		.chad5á
		.chaí5d
		.chaí5gí
		.chaí5m
		.chaí5o
		.chaí5teá
		.chaí5tí
		.chan5á
		.char6t5ar
		.char6tá
		.chár5ta.
		.cheil6te.
		.chí6
		.chló5f
		.chló5id
		.chló5im
		.chló5inn
		.chnaí3
		.chnó5
		.chóis5
		.ci6
		.cil6
		.cí6
		.cli6
		.clip5
		.cló5f
		.cló5id
		.cló5im
		.cnaí3
		.cnó5
		.da6
		.dh2
		.dhlí5d
		.dhlí5g
		.dhlí5m
		.dhlí3o
		.dhó5ite.
		.dhó5ití
		.dhreach5
		.dhreacht6
		.dhreo5f
		.dhreo5id
		.dhreo5im
		.dhreo5in
		.dlí5d
		.dlí5g
		.dlí5m
		.dlí5o
		.dó5f
		.dó5idí
		.dó5im
		.dó5ite.
		.dó5ití
		.dreach5
		.dreo5f
		.dreo5id
		.dreo5im
		.ead1
		.ea6g3
		.eal4t3
		.earb5
		.eas3tó
		.ei6
		.eisc3e
		.eis4il
		.éa6b
		.éad6ar
		.éa3g6ó
		.éar5
		.éart6
		.éi5d6r
		.éi5gear
		.éim5í
		.fa6
		.fach3
		.feo5f
		.feo5idí
		.feo5im
		.fhrioch5
		.fhua6fair
		.fhua6fara
		.fhua5im.
		.fí5dí
		.fí5g
		.fí5m
		.fí5odh
		.fí5onn
		.geal6t5aí
		.geat5
		.gh2
		.ghair5t
		.ghlae3
		.ghrá6n
		.góf5
		.ha4
		.hab6ai
		.hab6ar
		.hac6ad
		.hag6ar
		.hag4ó
		.hail6te
		.hain3g
		.hain3t
		.hain6te.
		.hair6ní
		.hais5ce
		.hais5tea
		.hais5t6eo
		.haist6i
		.hais5tig
		.haí4
		.hala5m6
		.halm4ó
		.hal4t3a
		.hal6t5á
		.han2a
		.hana5c
		.hanc6
		.han6fa
		.hang4l
		.han6ó
		.han4ta
		.har2a
		.har6á
		.har6ó5
		.haróc6
		.hart6
		.has6ai
		.has6al.
		.has6am
		.has4ta
		.hat6á
		.há6
		.háil6te.
		.háil6t5ea
		.háir5ge
		.háir5gí
		.háir6s
		.hál6t
		.hár4a
		.hár6m
		.head3
		.heal4t3
		.heis6il
		.héad6ar
		.héa3g6ó
		.héid4e
		.héi5dea
		.hib6é
		.him6ire
		.hios5
		.hiosc6
		.hir4
		.his4
		.hist3
		.hit6eo
		.hit6r
		.hí2
		.híl3
		.híoch5
		.híocht6
		.hoc4r
		.hod6
		.hogh6
		.hoir6n5i
		.hol6ac
		.hom2
		.hor5m
		.hort4
		.hó6
		.hua4f
		.huaf5a
		.huil4e
		.húd4
		.ia5it
		.iat6
		.ib6é
		.ibh5
		.id2
		.il3
		.im6ire
		.in6d5ia
		.in6id
		.in6ín
		.in4ío
		.in6ír
		.in6ste.
		.int6e
		.iomáin5
		.ios3
		.iosc6
		.iost4
		.ir4
		.is4
		.ist6
		.it6
		.íl3
		.ío6
		.íoch5
		.íocht6
		.íos5
		.la4
		.lach6t5
		.lad5a
		.lag5á
		.lait5
		.lan5c
		.lao5n
		.lá5ití
		.leab3ó
		.lea6m
		.leas5
		.leat6aí
		.leo3c
		.leoch4
		.lé5ann.
		.lé5igí
		.li6
		.lib5é
		.lim5
		.lint6
		.lip5
		.lí5d
		.lí5g
		.lí5mi
		.lí5od
		.lí5omar
		.lí5onn
		.lí6t
		.lít5i
		.lú2
		.mad5a
		.mair5tí.
		.maí5d
		.maí5gí
		.maí5mi
		.maí5od
		.maí5oma
		.maí5on
		.maí5teá
		.maí5tí
		.mam5
		.man2t
		.ma6r
		.mar6l5
		.mar6s5ac
		.mar6s5ai
		.mar5ta
		.mar5ú
		.ma6t
		.mat3á
		.mead5a
		.meat5á
		.mh2
		.mhad5a
		.mhais6te.
		.mhais6tí.
		.mhaí5d
		.mhaí5gí
		.mhaí5mi
		.mhaí5od
		.mhaí5oma
		.mhaí5on
		.mhaí5te.
		.mhaí5teá
		.mhaí5tí
		.mhan4t3
		.mhar6l5
		.mhar6sa.
		.mhion6t5a
		.mhí6oc
		.mhú6
		.mhúch5
		.mí6oc
		.mí5st
		.nair5
		.nais5
		.naí3
		.naío5l6
		.nar5
		.nd6
		.ndó5f
		.ndó5idí
		.ndó5im
		.ndó5in
		.neach6
		.neacht5
		.neá6
		.neád5
		.ng4
		.ngóf5
		.nit6
		.ní5d
		.ní5gí
		.ní5m
		.ní6oc
		.ní5od
		.ní5om
		.ní5on
		.nom6
		.och6t5
		.oc4r
		.od6
		.ogh6
		.oilt6
		.oir4n3e
		.oir6n5i
		.oir6ní
		.oir5t
		.ol6ac
		.om6a
		.or6ai
		.ort4
		.or6thu
		.os6ló.
		.ost5a
		.óp6
		.ór4á
		.phor5t6r
		.pist6
		.ra4
		.rad5a
		.rad5ó
		.raf6t5
		.rai6
		.rat5á
		.rá6
		.reas5
		.reo5f
		.reo5id
		.reo5im
		.reo5in
		.réim5i
		.rí5dí
		.rí5gí
		.rí5mi
		.rí6ocha
		.rí5od
		.rí5oma
		.rí5onn
		.rób5a
		.ró5c
		.róch6
		.róst5
		.rua5im.
		.rúm5
		.sa6l
		.sal5a
		.sá5ití
		.sc6
		.sca6
		.scad5á
		.scar5
		.scart6
		.searbh5
		.séa5l6ain
		.shá5inn.
		.si4
		.sim3
		.siún4
		.siúnt3
		.sí4o
		.slios5
		.sm4
		.sní5d
		.sní5g
		.sní5m
		.sní5od
		.sní5oma
		.sní5on
		.só5f
		.só5idí
		.só5im
		.só5inn
		.spléach5
		.st4
		.steam5
		.ta6
		.tach6t5
		.tan5g
		.tap5
		.tar5ta
		.téit5e
		.th2
		.théit5ea
		.thrá5ití
		.thróf5
		.ti6
		.tróf5
		.tsí6o
		.tua5im
		.ua4f
		.uaf5a
		.ua6i
		.uas6ala
		.uil2e
		.uir6t
		.uirthi5
		.un6s5
		.ur5b
		.ur3n4
		.úd2
		.úm5
		.úr6ái
		ab1a
		abac6
		aba5ca
		aba5dá
		ab4airt
		a3b4al
		ab4art
		ab1á
		ab3d
		abh1
		abh6aile
		a3bh6e
		abh6ór
		abh6re
		abh2t
		a5bi
		ab1l
		a5bó.
		ab3óig
		a5bón
		a1br
		ab3rad6
		abra3da
		a5bu
		ab1ú
		ac1a
		ac4adú
		acae6
		ac4aoi
		ac6ard
		aca1s4
		ac4astó
		aca3t4ú
		a3cáid
		acár5
		ac5é
		ach1a
		a4cha.
		acha6d5á
		achar5
		ach4arf
		acharn6
		achart6
		ach1á
		6achár
		6a3che
		ach3í
		4ach1l
		a6chli
		ach3óg
		ach5ór
		ach1r
		6achri
		ach1ú
		ac1l
		3acm
		ac1n
		ac1ó
		ac1ra
		acra3f
		ac4ras
		ac3ré
		a5cró
		ac5ua
		ac5ú
		adag6
		ad1al
		ad1am
		4adamh
		ada5n6ó
		ad3ara
		ad3arl
		ad5art
		ad5áil
		ad5ás
		4adc
		adh1
		adhb1
		a3dhi
		4adhro
		a5dhú
		ad3i
		4ad3l
		4a3d4o
		a1dó
		a4d3ód
		a2dóf
		a2d3óid
		a4d3óig
		a2d3óim
		a4d3óinn
		ad1r
		ad3rog
		ad3u
		ad1ú
		a3d4úr
		ae3a
		ae1á
		aeil3
		aeilg4
		aeilí5te
		af1
		afa3dá
		af5air
		af5art
		afáil3
		afáilt6
		afhol6
		afholt5
		a3f6l
		a3fo
		a3fóib
		a3fóin
		a1f2ón
		af6rá
		af6ú
		agad3á
		agair5n6
		ag2al
		ag5áis
		ag3e
		ag3é
		agh1
		agh4aid
		agh5an
		a5ghi
		ag3i
		ag1l
		a3go
		a3graim
		a3gram
		a6g5re
		ag3ri
		ag5rui
		ag3rú
		ag3ua
		ag3ú
		a1h
		ah6a
		aich6t
		ai5ciú
		aic5r
		6aidear
		4aidhl
		aid1i
		aidít5
		ai3fil
		ai3gin
		6aigis
		ail5bhí
		ailc3ea
		ailp3i
		ailp3ín
		ailt2
		a6imh
		4ai3mia
		aim3ise
		ain5í
		ains5eo
		ain6tean
		ain5té
		air6bh3r
		airb4í
		air4b5r
		air4dé
		airf5ean
		air6f5in.
		airf3í
		air4fín
		4airisc
		airis6t
		air5nín
		air5nío
		air4t5éis
		6aisei
		aisi3n4é
		ai5s6íl
		4aisp
		ais5teog
		ais6ti5s
		ais5t6ín.
		4aitei
		ai5t6il
		aits3e
		4aivi
		aí2c
		4aíní
		aí3o3dó
		aío5l6an
		aí3onna
		aí5ói
		al1a
		ala3b
		alabh4
		al4ainne
		alait4
		al3aí
		alan4a
		alan5d
		al2ann
		alas3
		alasc6
		4al4ath
		al1á
		a3láib
		6alám
		a3lár
		al1có
		6al5e
		al4f3air
		al3gó
		al3i
		a3lí
		a6ll
		al5o
		al1ó
		2alr
		a6lt
		alt3e
		al6t5ód
		al4tóf
		al6t5óid
		al6t5óim
		al6t5óin
		al6tú
		al3ui
		al3ú
		alú3ch4
		ama3b
		ama3d4ú
		am1al
		am5all
		am1an
		am3ara
		ama3raí
		a6mas
		ama5só
		4amál
		am4ána
		4amb
		amh1
		amh5ad
		amhais6t
		a3mhas
		a1mo
		am5óna
		6amp
		amp1a
		amp1á
		am4pr
		4amt
		am5ut
		am3úi
		am5úr
		anac4
		ana3ca
		an6ag
		6anaige
		anaist4
		an3ait
		an5aí
		ana5l6ó
		ana5m6ó
		ana5r6a
		anat6
		an1á
		an5áis
		a5n6áise
		an5ár
		6anb
		anc1a
		anc4aire
		an5cé5
		an2d3á
		andí6
		andíb5
		and3o
		an3dr
		6andu
		an3e
		an6ea
		an3é
		ang1
		ang3a
		anga3rú
		ang3á
		an5gó.
		anin5
		an4ma
		ann5
		6anná
		an3oi
		an5oí
		an1ó
		anód4
		anó3dó
		an4san
		an6sin
		an6tu
		an3u
		anuas6
		an1ú
		aoch3
		aocht6
		6aod
		ao5dar
		ao5idís
		ao5im.
		ao3imi
		aoin6s
		aoin3t2
		ao4l1
		ao5mar
		aon3u
		ao6r1
		aorg4
		aort4
		aos3t
		ap1
		apa5dá
		a3p4ait
		aplais6
		ar1a
		ara3bú
		ar6ac.
		ara3c6á
		arach6t5
		ara5có
		ara3g4a
		araic6í
		ara5l4á
		ara3p4
		ar5as.
		ara5só
		ara3tó
		ar1á
		arbh3a
		ar3bhe
		arch6
		arc1ó
		ar1cr
		ar1e
		ar2f1ó
		ar3i
		arm4ó
		a5ro
		ar1ó
		aróc6ar
		ar5ón
		ar5óp
		ar1p
		ar4p3ó
		ar4s3ál
		ar6sta
		ar3u
		ar3úil
		ar5úl
		ar3úp
		ar5ú5s6
		a5rút
		asa5c6a
		a3s4ae
		asain4
		as5aí
		as6alait
		asal2t
		asa5mait
		as6arb
		asc1
		ascar5
		as5cara
		ascart6
		as3co
		4ascr
		4as3e
		as3é
		as3i
		as3í
		2asl
		as1o
		as1ó
		as6óil
		a3s4ól
		as1ta
		as6t5ais
		ast4aí.
		ast3al
		asta5r6ó
		as6tas
		as3tán.
		as5té
		as3ti
		as5to
		a4stó
		as5tór
		as5tua
		as3tú
		as1u
		as1ú
		asúd6
		asú3it
		asú5m
		at1a
		atac6
		ata5cá
		atad5án
		at4agr
		a5t6aint
		at5a1l2
		ata3m
		atam4á
		a3t4ant
		ata3p4
		at5arn
		at3as
		atá6i
		a5tár
		atá5t
		atáth6
		até3
		atéad6
		ath1
		athrí5d
		athrí5gí
		athrí5m
		athrí5o
		ath6us
		at5ód
		a6tóg
		at3óid
		at3óig
		at3óim
		at5rap
		at1rá
		a6tro
		ats5a
		at6sar
		at1u
		at4ui
		at1ú
		a5vó
		áb3a
		áb4al
		áb1á
		ábh1
		ábht6
		áb1l
		á5bo
		áb3ó
		áb3ú
		ác1a
		ácar5
		ácarn6
		ách5á
		ách5e
		ách5i
		ách3l
		ách5r
		ách4t3
		ác3l
		ác3r
		ác3ú
		ád1
		á3d4ar
		ádh3a
		ádh5ú
		á1fa
		á4fa.
		á6f3ac
		áf5air
		áf5ara
		á3fá
		áf3l
		áf1r
		ága5dá
		á3gó
		ág3r
		ág5u
		á5há
		áib5é
		áid1
		á3idís
		á3igí
		áil5b
		áil3c6
		áilt6eá
		áilt3i
		ái6m
		á3im.
		áim5é
		á6imh
		á1imi
		á6im5ise
		6áinia
		áins4
		áin3te
		áin4teo
		6áip
		4áir4g3
		áirt3
		áisc1
		áist3e
		áist3i
		áis5t6íní
		á3itear
		áit3é
		áit3s
		á5íre
		ál1
		álc6
		ál4s3
		ám3an
		á3mar
		ám3at
		ámh1
		án1
		án6ga
		á3nna
		ánt4
		áp1
		ár1
		árach3
		ár5aim
		ár5am
		ár6ca
		á5r6é
		4árn2
		á3rol
		ár4ta
		árt6ai
		árt6an
		árt6r
		ás3a
		ásc3
		ás5c6á
		ás5e
		ás3í
		ás1ó
		ás1t4a
		ás3tú
		ás3u
		ás3ú
		át3a
		át1á
		áth1
		á3th4e
		át1ó
		át3r
		á5úl
		ba5cas
		4bacá
		bac6s5
		b5adar
		ba3dái
		b3aidí
		b3aig
		b3aim
		bain5t4
		baisc5e
		baist3
		bait3é
		b6aití
		b1aí
		balbh5á
		bamb6
		banais3
		ban3d4
		bar3b
		bar1n2
		b4arr
		bar3ú
		ba5s6áir
		ba5s6ár
		bas5c6ar6
		bascarn5
		bat5a
		bá5inn
		bá5ite.
		bá5iteá
		bá5ití
		bá5í6
		b1ál
		b4ált
		bár4
		bárth5
		b1c
		bc4á
		b5da
		b5dé
		b3dh
		3beab
		bea5bh6
		bea6c
		beal5t6
		bear3bó
		b1eá
		b6eár
		5b4ei
		beif6
		beil6t
		beir5f
		beir5tí
		beo3c
		beoch4
		beo5itea
		beo5m
		3béit
		b1f
		b3gh
		6bh.
		b4ha
		bha6d3á
		bha3g4á
		bh3aig
		bhain3t4
		bhaist3
		bhal6b
		bhalbh5
		bhar3b
		bhar3t4
		bhat5a
		bhá5inn
		bhá5iteá
		bhár6
		bhárth5
		bhc6á
		b4he
		4bhe.
		bh5eam
		3bh4ear
		2bh1eá
		bheif6
		bheil6t
		bheir5f
		bheir5tí
		bheo3c
		bheoch4
		bheo5g
		bhéal5
		bhéalt6
		bhé5ann
		bhia5ta.
		bhia5tac
		3bh4id
		bh3im
		bhin6s3e
		bhin6sí
		bhin6t5e
		bhion5gó
		bhios5
		3bh4irt
		6bh3iú
		4bhíg
		4bh3ím
		bh3ín
		4bhío
		bhí5ot
		4bhít
		bhí6th
		3bh4las
		bhlá6
		bhláf5
		bhlead5
		1bho
		bhol6ta.
		bhol6t5aí
		bhol6tá
		bh1ó
		bhói5s6
		bhó5l6ac
		bhran6d5
		6bhre.
		bh6réa
		bh6ric
		bhrí3oc
		bhrío5mh4
		4bhs
		bh5tí
		1bhu
		bh4ua
		bhua5da
		bhua5im
		bhua5ite.
		bhual5
		4bhuit
		bh3uith
		bhurd5á
		bhur2l3
		bhust5
		bhúir5
		bhúis5
		bhúm5
		bia3l
		bia5ta.
		bia5t6ac
		bia5t6aig
		bia5t6aí
		b1id
		bid5i
		bin4
		bi3né
		bin5i
		bins3
		bint3
		bion5gó
		bios5
		biosc6
		6b1ir
		6bis3
		bist4
		bit5s
		bí3c
		b1ín
		b1ít
		bít5eac
		bí6th5
		bí6tig
		blad5a
		bla3gr
		blas3
		blá4
		bláf3
		blead5
		bl6i
		blim6
		b1lí
		b1ló
		bn6i
		b3ní
		bod3ó
		bol4s
		bol6ta.
		bol6t5aí
		bol4tá
		bord3
		bos5t6
		b1óg
		b3óid
		bó5l6ac
		bó6s5
		bóth5
		bp6á
		bp6i
		bpist6
		b5po
		brad5á
		bran6d5
		bran3g4
		brat5ó
		bré6
		b1rí
		brío3mh4
		b1s2
		b1t
		bth6
		bua5da
		bua3im
		buair3
		bua5ite.
		bua5itear
		buin6t
		bun1
		bur2
		burd3
		burl1
		bust5
		3búid
		búir5
		búis5
		búm3
		cab5al
		c1ac
		c1ad
		ca3dá
		cae4d3
		caib5é
		caidh5ne
		cai5m4é
		cain6d
		cain2t3
		cair6b
		cairbh5
		cair6d5í
		cair6t5e
		c2aisn
		cais3t6
		cait3é
		c1aí
		cal5an
		calbh3a
		cal4m
		ca3mán
		can5c6
		can5s6
		can3t2
		5caod
		c6ara
		3c4ar1b
		carbh4
		card3
		c4arl
		carn5á
		c4ars
		c6arta
		cart6ac
		car3ú
		cas1
		cast6
		cas5tó
		cat5a
		cat3ó
